Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-667
Stop or stopping, defined.

(1) Stop, when required, shall mean a complete cessation of movement.

(2) Stop or stopping, when prohibited, shall mean any halting even momentarily of a vehicle, whether occupied or not, except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic or in compliance with the directions of a peace officer or traffic control device.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 163.